dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="Missst/and__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>and</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ands</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>and</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>and</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ände</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ände</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änden</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ände</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mohr__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mosaik__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="M/und__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>und</l>     <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>unds</l>    <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>und</l>     <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>und</l>     <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ünder</l>   <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ünder</l>   <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ündern</l>  <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ünder</l>   <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>undes</l>   <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>unde</l>    <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="M/utter__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>utter</l>   <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>utter</l>   <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>utter</l>   <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>utter</l>   <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ütter</l>   <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ütter</l>   <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>üttern</l>  <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ütter</l>   <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>uttern</l>  <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>uttern</l>  <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>uttern</l>  <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>uttern</l>  <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>utters</l>  <r>utter<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Myth/os__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>os</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>os</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>os</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>os</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="N/agel__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>agel</l>    <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>agels</l>   <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>agel</l>    <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>agel</l>    <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ägel</l>    <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ägel</l>    <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ägeln</l>   <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ägel</l>    <r>agel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="N/ot__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ot</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ot</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ot</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ot</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>öte</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>öte</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>öten</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>öte</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Fingernagel"><i>Fingern</i><par n="N/agel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Großmutter"><i>Großm</i><par n="M/utter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hungersnot"><i>Hungersn</i><par n="N/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Königinmutter"><i>Königinm</i><par n="M/utter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mosaik"><i>Mosaik</i><par n="Mosaik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mund"><i>M</i><par n="M/und__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mutter"><i>M</i><par n="M/utter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nagel"><i>N</i><par n="N/agel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Not"><i>N</i><par n="N/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Oberst"><i>Oberst</i><par n="Mohr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schwiegermutter"><i>Schwiegerm</i><par n="M/utter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Stiefmutter"><i>Stiefm</i><par n="M/utter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Urgroßmutter"><i>Urgroßm</i><par n="M/utter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Vorfahr"><i>Vorfahr</i><par n="Mohr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zwischenstand"><i>Zwischenst</i><par n="Missst/and__n"/></e>
